Tennessee, session 114, HB2617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 14, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
4-3-1416. Federal Workforce Pell Grants – Approval – Implementation.
(a) For purposes of this section, "eligible workforce training programs" means
programs that meet applicable requirements in Section 83002 of Pub. L. No. 119-21.
(b) The governor shall, in consultation with the state workforce development
board:
(1) Approve all eligible workforce training programs for the purposes of
federal workforce Pell grants; and
(2) Coordinate approval of eligible workforce training programs with other
state and federal workforce programs to avoid duplicative payments for the same
student costs that are covered by federal workforce Pell grants.
(c) The board shall establish an internal procedure to determine that a program
meets the applicable federal requirements to be an eligible workforce training program.
(d) A department, agency, or board of state government does not have authority
to promulgate a rule to implement this section.
SECTION 2. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
HB2617
012214
- 1 -

SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012214